trunk/apertium-oldca-XX/apertium-oldca-XX.oldca.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="iso-8859-1"?>
<!-- Diccionari morfològic de català antic  
     http://internostrum.com/lematitzador/
     Es distribueix amb llicència GPL 2.0: 
     http://www.gnu.org/licenses/old-licenses/gpl-2.0.txt      
     (c) Universitat d'Alacant
     (c) Generalitat Valenciana
-->
<dictionary>
  <alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
  <sdefs>
    <sdef n="Npropi"/>
    <sdef n="lloc"/>
    <sdef n="titol"/>
    <sdef n="adj"/>
    <sdef n="fem"/>
    <sdef n="masc"/>
    <sdef n="MF"/>
    <sdef n="sg"/>
    <sdef n="pl"/>
    <sdef n="adv"/>
    <sdef n="prep"/>
    <sdef n="pron"/>
    <sdef n="quant"/>
    <sdef n="pers"/>
    <sdef n="rel"/>
    <sdef n="indef"/>
    <sdef n="art"/>
    <sdef n="def"/>
    <sdef n="interrog"/>
    <sdef n="det"/>
    <sdef n="dem"/>
    <sdef n="conj"/>
    <sdef n="neutre"/>
    <sdef n="verb"/>
    <sdef n="inf"/>
    <sdef n="ger"/>
    <sdef n="partpi"/>
    <sdef n="PresInd"/>
    <sdef n="IndefInd"/>
    <sdef n="p1"/>
    <sdef n="p2"/>
    <sdef n="p3"/>
    <sdef n="ImpInd"/>
    <sdef n="FutInd"/>
    <sdef n="CondInd"/>
    <sdef n="PresSubj"/>
    <sdef n="ImpSubj"/>
    <sdef n="Imperatiu"/>
    <sdef n="poss"/>
    <sdef n="gen"/>
    <sdef n="nom"/>
    <sdef n="com"/>
    <sdef n="SP"/>
    <sdef n="ac"/>
    <sdef n="dat"/>
    <sdef n="ref"/>
    <sdef n="sup"/>
    <sdef n="num"/>
    <sdef n="card"/>
    <sdef n="ord"/>
    <sdef n="interj"/>
    <sdef n="loc"/>
  </sdefs>

  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="accep_a">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_e·">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>·</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_a·">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>·</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>'</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_ant">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ant</l>
          <r><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ants</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ans</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_b">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>b</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_c_sibilant">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ss</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ç</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_c_velar">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>qu</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cc</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_d">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_e">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_eix">
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e"/>
        <p>
          <l>ix</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ais</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ays</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ax</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ex</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_ent">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ent</l>
          <r><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>en</l>
          <r><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>én</l>
          <r><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>èn</l>
          <r><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ents</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ens</l>
          <r><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_ff">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>f</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ff</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_g_gu">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_g_palatal">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_g_velar">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>g</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>c</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gu</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_i_cons">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hi</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>j</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_ie">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_ix">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ix</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>x</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yx</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="accep_l">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ll</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

      <e>
        <par n="accep_ff"/>
        <p>
          <l>is</l>
          <r>fiscar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C_CAR"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
        <p>
          <l>sm</l>
          <r>esmar<s n="verb"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V1C"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>pl</l>
          <r></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a"/>
        <p>
          <l>v</l>
          <r>plevir</r>
        </p>
        <par n="A_V3C_inc"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>arismèti</l>
          <r>aritmètic<s n="nom"/><s n="masc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_c_velar"/>
        <par n="plC"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cal</l>
          <r>calb<s n="adj"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_b"/>
        <par n="pl_fem"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>conten</l>
          <r>contenció<s n="nom"/><s n="fem"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_c_sibilant"/>
        <par n="ió"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cr</l>
          <r>creix<s n="nom"/><s n="masc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_eix"/>
        <par n="pl_os"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>da</i>
        <par n="accep_l"/>
        <p>
          <l>màti</l>
          <r>umàtiga<s n="nom"/><s n="fem"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="pl_G"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="accep_e_prefix"/>
        <p>
          <l>sto</l>
          <r>estoc<s n="nom"/><s n="masc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_c_velar"/>
        <par n="plC"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <i>fant</i>
        <par n="subst_a"/>
        <p>
          <l>si</l>
          <r>siant<s n="adj"/><s n="MF"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>paci</l>
          <r>pacient<s n="nom"/><s n="MF"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ent"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>par</l>
          <r>pare<s n="nom"/><s n="masc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_e"/>
        <par n="plC"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>peni</l>
          <r>penitent<s n="adj"/><s n="MF"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_d"/>
        <par n="accep_ent"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>plor</l>
          <r>plorant<s n="adj"/><s n="MF"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sir</l>
          <r>sirgant<s n="nom"/><s n="masc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_g_velar"/>
        <par n="accep_ant"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="inser_h"/>
        <par n="subst_e"/>
        <p>
          <l>ret</l>
          <r>retge<s n="nom"/><s n="MF"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_g_palatal"/>
        <par n="plC"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="subst_ll"/>
        <i>i</i>
        <par n="accep_g_gu"/>
        <p>
          <l>am</l>
          <r>gam<s n="nom"/><s n="masc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="plC"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="subst_à"/>
        <p>
          <l>ncor</l>
          <r>ncora<s n="nom"/><s n="fem"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a·"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>en<s n="art"/><s n="pers"/><s n="fem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_a·"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <par n="inser_a_prefix"/>
        <par n="accep_i_cons"/>
        <p>
          <l>tan</l>
          <r>tant<s n="pron"/><s n="indef"/><s n="masc"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="plC"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r>te<s n="pron"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p2"/><s n="MF"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_e·"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>m</l>
          <r>me<s n="pron"/><s n="dat"/><s n="p1"/><s n="MF"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ie"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n</l>
          <r>en<s n="pron"/><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_e·"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ca</l>
          <r>caix<s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="accep_ix"/>
      </e>
